Utah statutes.
58-46a-307.   Licensee required to prove licensure to commence or maintain action.

A person may not commence or maintain an action in any court of the state for collection or compensation in any amount resulting from performance of acts or practices for which a license is required under this chapter unless that person was properly licensed under this chapter as a hearing instrument specialist at the time there was an agreement made to perform the regulated acts and practices, when the regulated acts and practices were performed, and when the alleged cause of action arose.

